Hawaii, session 2026, SB1559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that dune restoration at Hanakaoo beach park builds resilience and infrastructure protection from high wave events and functions as a natural buffer against the effects of sea level rise.  In addition to cultural practices and community gatherings, Hanakaoo beach is a prime location for Hawaiian outrigger canoeing and is the home for all west Maui canoe clubs.  The emphasis on dune restoration as a nature-based, low-impact solution reflects a thoughtful approach that balances environmental sustainability with cultural and recreational needs.  The legislature further finds that, for effective dune restoration, the park needs further technical guidance and assistance in using the tools of dune restoration to create productive dune habitat and to restore dunes and ecosystem services. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate moneys for fiscal years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 to the university of Hawaii sea grant college program to partner with the county of Maui in dune restoration at Hanakaoo beach park. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $250,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for dune restoration at Hanakaoo beach park. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________